Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.175.115

Statewide dropout reengagement program—Rules.

(1) The office of the superintendent of public instruction shall adopt rules to implement RCW 28A.175.100 through 28A.175.110.

(2) When adopting rules under this section and developing model interlocal agreements and contracts under RCW 28A.175.110, the office of the superintendent of public instruction shall consult with the state board for community and technical colleges, the workforce training and education coordinating board, colleges and community-based organizations that have previously offered dropout reengagement programs, providers of online courses and programs approved under RCW 28A.250.020, school districts, and educational service districts.

[ 2010 c 20 s 5.]

NOTES:

Intent—2010 c 20: See note following RCW 28A.175.100.